src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Kildin Saami noun inflection

"class1" = monosyllabic/non-palatalized inflection foot, str-wk, no ablaut/umlaut, palatalization in Ill.Sg
LEXICON 1DA  is orthographic subclass with xx--> x

LEXICON 1DB  is orthographic subclass with xy-->x and "half-palatalization" in Ill.Sg;
OBS! SgIllSufJE vs. SgIllSufHalfE does not mark a true morphological subclass, but is due to orthographic conventions

Lexica 2D etc are classes from Kuruch dictionary.
It is unclear whether this is the correct classification

LEXICON 2D  like 1D ?  these are just dummy for the moment

LEXICON 3D 

LEXICON 4D   is contract

LEXICON 4DА  

LEXICON 5D   goes to 1DA

LEXICON OAHPA_N   is all the words from OAHPA_N, we just point them to 1DA.

LEXICON ELAN_N   is all the words from ELAN_N, we just point them to 1DA.

## Case affixes

LEXICON SgNomSuf 

LEXICON SgGenAccSuf 

LEXICON EssSuf 
Превр. !check here and elsewhere whether the palatal-mark-deletion-rule is really needed here (it's already included above)

LEXICON ParSufE  

LEXICON ParSufHalfE  

LEXICON SgLocSuf  

LEXICON SgIllSufA  

LEXICON SgIllSufE 

LEXICON SgIllSufJE 

LEXICON SgIllSufHalfE 

LEXICON SgAbeSuf 

LEXICON SgComSuf 

LEXICON PlNomSuf 

LEXICON PlGenSuf 

LEXICON PlAccSuf 

LEXICON PlIllSuf 

LEXICON PlLocSuf 

LEXICON PlAbeSuf 

LEXICON PlComSuf 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sjd/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
